Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1151.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 16m. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.223(2) Pub saf F Sale of firearm to minor â subsequent offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.223(3) Pub ord D Sale of firearm to person prohibited from possessing 10 750.224 Pub saf E Manufacture or sale of silencer, bomb, blackjack, automatic weapon, gas spray, etc. 5 750.224a(4) Pub saf F Possession or sale of electrical current weapons 4 750.224a(6) Pub saf G Improper use of electro-muscular disruption device 2 750.224b Pub saf E Possession of short barreled shotgun or rifle 5 750.224c Pub saf F Armor piercing ammunition 4 750.224d(2) Person G Using self-defense spray device 2 750.224e Pub saf F Manufacture/sale/possession of devices to convert semiautomatic weapons 4 750.224f(6) Pub saf E Possession or sale of firearm by prohibited person 5 750.224f(7) Pub saf E Possession or sale of ammunition by prohibited person 5 750.226 Pub saf E Carrying firearm or dangerous weapon with unlawful intent 5 750.227 Pub saf E Carrying a concealed weapon 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.227a Pub saf F Unlawful possession of pistol 4 750.227c Pub saf G Possessing a loaded firearm in or upon a vehicle 2 750.227f Pub saf F Wearing body armor during commission of certain crimes 4 750.227g(1) Pub saf F Felon purchasing, owning, possessing, or using body armor 4 750.230 Pub saf G Altering ID mark on firearm 2 750.232a(3) Pub saf G False statement in a firearm application 4 750.234a(1)(a) Pub saf D Discharging firearm from vehicle 10 750.234a(1)(b) Person C Discharging firearm from vehicle causing physical injury 15 750.234a(1)(c) Person B Discharging firearm from vehicle causing serious impairment 20 750.234a(1)(d) Person A Discharging firearm from vehicle causing death Life 750.234b(1) Pub saf D Discharging firearm at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure 10 750.234b(2) Pub saf D Discharging firearm in a dwelling or potentially occupied structure 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.234b(3) Pub saf C Discharging firearm in or at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure causing physical injury 15 750.234b(4) Person B Discharging firearm in or at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure causing serious impairment 20 750.234b(5) Person A Discharging firearm in or at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure causing death Life 750.234c Pub saf F Discharging firearm at emergency/police vehicle 4 750.235b(2) Pub saf D Threatening to commit violent act against school students or employees on school property with an overt act toward completion or with specific intent 10 750.236 Person C Setting spring gun â death resulting 15 750.237(3) Person E Using firearm while under the influence or impaired causing serious impairment 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 750.237(4) Person C Using firearm while under the influence or impaired causing death 15 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 1150 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.